Wyoming statutes. Title 22 Elections
Repeal of former title 22. —

Laws 1973, ch. 251, repealed former title 22 and enacted §§ 22.1-1 to 22.1-426 [§§

22-1-101

to

22-27-101

], constituting a complete recodification of the Wyoming election laws.

Annotations from cases decided under former title 22 and other repealed statutory provisions have been placed under comparable sections within this title.

History of former title. —

The original basic act from which the election laws derived was Laws 1890, ch. 80, §§ 1 to 182, and it covered generally all phases of elections. At the time of the 1945 compilation, almost all of these sections, as amended, were still in effect, although the election laws had been supplemented by a large number of additional independent acts and several sections had been added to Laws 1890, ch. 80, by Laws 1890-91, ch. 68, and Laws 1897, ch. 53.

Between 1945 and the 1957 compilation, the legislature enacted a number of statutes relating to elections. Notable among these were the permanent registration act, Laws 1949, ch. 122, and the two election law revision acts found in Laws 1951, chs. 127 and 139. These statutes repealed many of the sections of the 1945 compilation derived from Laws 1890, ch. 80, amended others, and enacted many new provisions which were incorporated in former title 22. Certain provisions of that title were affected by Laws 1953, ch. 166 and Laws 1957, ch. 120. Laws 1961, ch. 235 completely revised chapters 1 to 6, 9, and 11 to 13 of former title 22, as amended by Laws 1959, chs. 101, 167 and 201. After its revision in 1969, former title 22 was subsequently amended by Laws 1963, chs. 100, 157; 1965, ch. 16; 1967, chs. 14, 38, 118, 222; 1969, ch. 206; 1971, chs. 177, 196, 226, 227, 240, 250; 1971 Sp. Sess., chs. 3, 4.

Constitutionality of former provisions governing minor partyballot access. —

The former provisions of the Wyoming Election Code governing minor party ballot access were unduly burdensome and, hence, unconstitutional. Blomquist v. Thomson, 591 F. Supp. 768, 1984 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 19379 (D. Wyo.), rev'd, 739 F.2d 525,

1984 U.S. App. LEXIS 20277

(10th Cir. Wyo. 1984) (decided under pre-1984 version of former § 22-1-102(g) and prior to enactment of former §

22-4-201

et seq.).